Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Task Force on Tribal Consultation 2025 is established.
(2) The task force consists of 17 members appointed as follows:
(a) The President of the Senate shall appoint  one member from among members of the
Senate.
(b) The Speaker  of the House of Representatives shall appoint one member from among
members of the House of Representatives.
(c) The President of the Senate and  the Speaker of the House of Representatives shall
jointly appoint one member who is a member of the Commission on Indian Services.
(d) The Governor shall appoint:
(A) One member who is a representative of the office of the Governor;
(B) One member from each of the nine federally recognized Indian tribes in  this state;
and
(C) Four members, each of whom is a  representative of a state agency that is required
to engage in tribal consultation.
(3) In appointing members to the task force under subsection (2) of this  section, the ap-
pointing authority shall, where feasible, appoint individuals who served  as members of the
Task Force on Tribal Consultation described in section 1, chapter 531, Oregon Laws 2023.
(4) The task force shall identify and clarify the requirements of  state agencies to engage
in tribal consultation. In carrying out the duties described in this subsection, the task force
shall strive to continue any work of the Task Force on Tribal  Consultation described in
section 1, chapter 531, Oregon Laws 2023.
(5) A majority of the voting members of the task force constitutes a quorum for the
transaction of business.
(6) Official action by the task force requires the approval of a majority of  the voting
members of the task force.
(7) The task force shall elect one of its members to serve as chairperson.
(8) If  there is a vacancy for any cause, the appointing authority shall make an appoint-
ment to become immediately effective.
(9) The task force shall meet at times and places specified by the call  of the chairperson
or of a majority of the voting members of the task force.
(10) The task force may adopt rules necessary for the operation of the task force.
Enrolled House Bill 2069 (HB 2069-A) Page 1
(11) The task force shall submit a report in the manner  provided by ORS 192.245, and
may include recommendations  for legislation, to an interim committee of the Legislative
Assembly related to government no later than September 15, 2026.
(12) The office of the Governor shall provide staff support to the task force.
(13) Members  of the Legislative Assembly appointed to the task force are nonvoting
members of the task force and may act in an advisory capacity only.
(14) Members of the task force who are not members of the  Legislative Assembly are not
entitled to compensation or reimbursement for expenses and serve as volunteers on  the task
force.
(15) All agencies of state government, as defined  in ORS 174.111, are directed to assist
the task force in the performance  of the duties of the task force and, to the extent permitted
by laws relating to confidentiality, to furnish information and advice the members of the
task force consider necessary to perform their duties.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on December 31, 2026.
SECTION 3. There is appropriated to the office of the Governor, for  the biennium be-
ginning July 1, 2025, out of the General Fund, the amount  of $70,000 for the purpose of car-
rying out the provisions of section 1 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 4. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by House June 12, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 19, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2069 (HB 2069-A) Page 2